Utah statutes.
45-2-6.   Right of station to require submission of matter intended to be
broadcast.
Any person, firm, or corporation owning or operating a radio or television
broadcasting station shall have the right, but shall not be compelled, to
require the submission and permanent filing, in such station, of a copy of the
complete address, script, or other form of expression, intended to be
broadcast over such station before the time of the intended broadcast thereof.
